Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-405.04
Inhabitants of annexed land; benefits; ordinances.

The inhabitants of territories annexed under the provisions of sections 17-405.01 to 17-405.05 shall receive substantially the benefits of other inhabitants of such municipality as soon as practicable, and adequate plans and necessary city council or village board action to furnish such benefits as police, fire, snow removal, and water service must be adopted not later than one year after the date of annexation, and such inhabitants shall be subject to the ordinances and regulations of such municipality; Provided, that such one-year period shall be tolled pending final court decision in any court action to contest such annexation.

Laws 1967, c. 74, § 4, p. 241.